South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1031.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 4 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 4-1-190. (A) A county council may not adopt or enforce an ordinance, provision, building code, or other regulation that prohibits or limits, either directly or indirectly, the use of a specific style of exterior cladding or finish materials for residential or commercial buildings in a manner that is more restrictive than state or national building codes. (B) This section does not apply to a special purpose district, overlay zone, or historic area. SECTION 2.  Chapter 25, Title 5 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 5-25-950.  (A) A city council or governing body of an incorporated city or town may not adopt or enforce an ordinance, provision, building code, or other regulation that prohibits or limits, either directly or indirectly, the use of a specific style of exterior cladding or finish materials for residential or commercial buildings in a manner that is more restrictive than state or national building codes. (B) This section does not apply to a special purpose district, overlay zone, or historic area. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----